Hawaii statutes.
§806-18 Change of venue. It shall be
lawful for any court of record or judge thereof, at any state of any criminal
proceedings depending therein, whether the venue be by law local or not, to
order that the venue be changed, and to direct that the trial be had in
Honolulu or in some particular judicial circuit, in such cases and for such
reasons as the justice of the case may require, and subject to such conditions
as the court or judge may, in its or the judge's discretion, impose. [L 1876, c
40, §13; RL 1925, §4032; RL 1935, §5496; RL 1945, §10797; RL 1955, §258-7; HRS
§711-18; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Change of venue, see §603-37.

Rules of Court

Transfer from district or circuit for trial, see HRPP rule 21.

Time of motion to transfer, see HRPP rule 22.

Case Notes

Change of venue granted to facilitate production of
evidence. 9 H. 360 (1894).

Change of venue lies in sound discretion of court. 11 H. 314
(1898); 46 H. 183, 377 P.2d 728 (1962).

See 3 H. 90 (1869).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next